Utah statutes.
75-3-607.   Order restraining personal representative.
(1) On petition of any person who appears to have an interest in the estate,
the court by temporary order may restrain a personal representative from
performing specified acts of administration, disbursement, or distribution, or
exercise of any powers or discharge of any duties of his office, or make any
other order to secure proper performance of his duty, if it appears to the
court that the personal representative otherwise may take some action which
would jeopardize unreasonably the interest of the applicant or of some other
interested person. Persons with whom the personal representative may transact
business may be made parties.
(2)  The matter shall be set for hearing within 10 days unless the parties
otherwise agree. Notice as the court directs shall be given to the personal
representative and his attorney of record, if any, and to any other parties
named defendant in the petition.
(3)  Upon petition made by any guardian, conservator, protected person, ward,
creditor, or other person interested in the estate as an heir, devisee or
otherwise, against any person suspected of having concealed, embezzled, or
smuggled, laid away or disposed of any moneys, goods, or chattels of the
decedent or to have in his possession or subject to his knowledge, any deeds,
conveyances, bonds, contracts, or other writings, or any personal estate, or
any other claim or demand or any last will of the decedent, the court may cite
the suspected person to appear before it and may examine and proceed with him
on the charge; and if on such examination it appears that he has wrongful
possession of any such items, the court may order the delivery of the same to
the personal representative, guardian, or conservator.
